South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S868.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Declaration SECTION 1.    The General Assembly declares that the sacrifices made by first responders killed in the line of duty, and by their surviving families, deserve formal and enduring recognition by the State of South Carolina. Gold Shield Day SECTION 2.    Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-335.    June first of each year is designated as "Gold Shield Day" in honor of first responders who have been killed in the line of duty, and the surviving spouses, children, and families who bear the lasting impact of that sacrifice. State agencies, political subdivisions, and public institutions are encouraged to recognize Gold Shield Day through appropriate ceremonies, proclamations, or educational activities. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________